Hawaii statutes.
§171-43.1 Lease to eleemosynary
organizations. The board may lease, at a nominal consideration, by direct
negotiation and without recourse to public auction, public lands to an
eleemosynary organization which has been certified to be tax exempt under sections
501(c)(1) or 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The
lands shall be used by such eleemosynary organizations for the purposes for
which their charter was issued and for which they were certified by the
Internal Revenue Service. [L 1970, c 83, §5; am L 1971, c 100, §1; am L 1982, c
202, §1; am L 1991, c 212, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next